src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
#  Verb lexicon  

Stems according to Edna MacLean

* Lexicon inventory of stems (Feb 2009):
	* 822 IV
	* 421 IV_vow
	* 215 TV_vow
	*  73 TV
	*  70 verb_intr_suq

Note that there are appr 120 verb + contlex combination being identical.
They must thus be uniqed. The list is found at the end of this document.
